Washington statutes.
RCW 9.16.120

Use of the word "sterling" on mounting.

Every person who shall make, sell, offer to sell or dispose of, or have in his or her possession with intent to sell or dispose of, any article comprised of leather, shell, ivory, celluloid, pearl, glass, porcelain, pottery, steel or wood, to which is applied or attached a metal mounting marked, stamped or branded with the words "sterling," or "sterling silver," unless nine hundred twenty-five one-thousandths of the component parts of the metal of which such metal mounting is manufactured is pure silver, shall be guilty of a gross misdemeanor.

[ 2011 c 336 s 292; 1909 c 249 s 430; RRS s 2682.]